Idaho statutes. Title 37 FOOD, DRUGS, AND OIL
Chapter 27 UNIFORM CONTROLLED SUBSTANCES
§ 37-2727. Controlled substances in opioid (narcotic) treatment programs.

At a facility with a controlled substance registration certificate issued by the United States department of justice, drug enforcement administration, for the operation of a narcotic treatment program, a nurse licensed under chapter 14, title 54, Idaho Code, may, pursuant to a valid order of a physician licensed under chapter 18, title 54, Idaho Code:

Prepare and administer to a patient at that facility a controlled substance whether or not a practitioner is present; and

Deliver at that facility to a patient for subsequent use by the patient off-site, take-home doses of a controlled substance, provided that:

The patient is entitled to receive take-home doses of the controlled substance;

The take-home doses delivered by the nurse to the patient were obtained at the facility by the nurse from a locked storage area suitable to prevent unauthorized access and to ensure a proper environment for preservation of the drugs within such area; and

The take-home doses were prepared pursuant to a valid prescription drug order of the physician and were provided in a suitable container appropriately labeled for use by the patient.

If the amount due to such person is less than the value of the conveyance, the conveyance may be sold at public auction by the director or appropriate prosecuting attorney. The director, or appropriate prosecuting attorney, shall publish a notice of the sale by at least one (1) publication in a newspaper published and circulated in the city, community or locality where the sale is to take place at least one (1) week prior to sale of the conveyance. The proceeds from such sale shall be distributed as follows in the order indicated:

To the bona fide or innocent owner, purchaser, conditional sales vendor, lienholder or mortgagee of the conveyance, if any, up to the value of his interest in the conveyance.

The balance, if any, in the following order:

In any case, the director, or appropriate prosecuting attorney, may, within thirty (30) days after judgment, pay the balance due to the bona fide lienholder, mortgagee or conditional sales vendor and thereby purchase the conveyance for use to enforce this act.

A nurse acting under the authority of this section is exempt from the registration requirements imposed by this chapter.

The facility must be registered under chapter 17, title 54, Idaho Code.

§ 37-2728 — 37-2730. Retention of prescription book by prescriber — Prescription book open for inspection — Filling prescriptions — Disposition of original and copy. [Repealed.]

§ 37-2730A. Prescription tracking program.

The board shall maintain a program to track the prescriptions for controlled substances that are filed with the board under section 37-2726, Idaho Code, for the purpose of assisting in identifying illegal activity related to the dispensing of controlled substances and for the purpose of assisting the board in providing information to patients, practitioners and pharmacists to assist in avoiding inappropriate use of controlled substances. The tracking program and any data created thereby shall be administered by the board.

The board shall use the information obtained through the tracking program in identifying activity it reasonably suspects may be in violation of this chapter or medical assistance law. The board shall report this information to the individuals and persons set forth in section 37-2726(2), Idaho Code. The board may release unsolicited information to pharmacists and practitioners when the release of information may be of assistance in preventing or avoiding inappropriate use of controlled substances. The board may provide the appropriate law enforcement agency, medicaid or medicare agency or licensing board with the relevant information in the board’s possession, including information obtained from the tracking program, for further investigation, or other appropriate law enforcement or administrative enforcement use.

Information, which does not identify individual patients, practitioners or dispensing pharmacists or pharmacies, may be released by the board for educational, research or public information purposes.

Nothing herein shall prevent a pharmacist or practitioner from furnishing another pharmacist or practitioner information obtained pursuant to and in compliance with this chapter.

Unless there is shown malice or criminal intent or gross negligence or reckless, willful and wanton conduct as defined in section 6-904C, Idaho Code, the state of Idaho, the board, any other state agency, or any person, or entity in proper possession of information as herein provided shall not be subject to any liability or action for money damages or other legal or equitable relief by reason of any of the following:

The furnishing of information under the conditions herein provided;

The receiving and use of, or reliance on, such information;

The fact that any such information was not furnished; or

The fact that such information was factually incorrect or was released by the board to the wrong person or entity.

The board may apply for any available grants and accept any gifts, grants or donations to assist in developing and maintaining the program required by this section.

§ 37-2731. Information required on label.

A practitioner with statutory authority to dispense a controlled substance shall affix to the package a label pursuant to board rule.

§ 37-2732. Prohibited acts A — Penalties.

Except as authorized by this chapter, it is unlawful for any person to manufacture or deliver, or possess with intent to manufacture or deliver, a controlled substance.

Any person who violates this subsection with respect to:

A controlled substance classified in schedule I which is a narcotic drug or a controlled substance classified in schedule II, except as provided for in section 37-2732B(a)(3), Idaho Code, is guilty of a felony and upon conviction may be imprisoned for a term of years not to exceed life imprisonment, or fined not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), or both;

Any other controlled substance which is a nonnarcotic drug classified in schedule I, or a controlled substance classified in schedule III, is guilty of a felony and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than five (5) years, fined not more than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000), or both;

A substance classified in schedule IV, is guilty of a felony and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than three (3) years, fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both;

A substance classified in schedules V and VI, is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than one (1) year, fined not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.

Except as authorized by this chapter, it is unlawful for any person to create, deliver, or possess with intent to deliver, a counterfeit substance.

Any person who violates this subsection with respect to:

A counterfeit substance classified in schedule I which is a narcotic drug, or a counterfeit substance classified in schedule II, is guilty of a felony and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than fifteen (15) years, fined not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), or both;

Any other counterfeit substance classified in schedule I which is a nonnarcotic drug contained in schedule I or a counterfeit substance contained in schedule III, is guilty of a felony and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than five (5) years, fined not more than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000), or both;

A counterfeit substance classified in schedule IV, is guilty of a felony and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than three (3) years, fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both;

A counterfeit substance classified in schedules V and VI or a noncontrolled counterfeit substance, is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than one (1) year, fined not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.

Any person who violates this subsection and has in his possession a controlled substance which is a nonnarcotic drug classified in schedule I except lysergic acid diethylamide, or a controlled substance classified in schedules III, IV, V and VI is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof may be imprisoned for not more than one (1) year, or fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.

It is unlawful for any person to possess a controlled substance unless the substance was obtained directly from, or pursuant to, a valid prescription or order of a practitioner while acting in the course of his professional practice, or except as otherwise authorized by this chapter.
(1) Any person who violates this subsection and has in his possession a controlled substance classified in schedule I which is a narcotic drug or a controlled substance classified in schedule II, is guilty of a felony and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than seven (7) years, or fined not more than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000), or both.

It shall be unlawful for any person to be present at or on premises of any place where he knows illegal controlled substances are being manufactured or cultivated, or are being held for distribution, transportation, delivery, administration, use, or to be given away. A violation of this section shall deem those persons guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine of not more than three hundred dollars ($300) and not more than ninety (90) days in the county jail, or both.

If any person is found to possess marijuana, which for the purposes of this subsection shall be restricted to all parts of the plants of the genus Cannabis, including the extract or any preparation of cannabis which contains tetrahydrocannabinol, in an amount greater than three (3) ounces net weight, it shall be a felony and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than five (5) years, or fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both.

If two (2) or more persons conspire to commit any offense defined in this act, said persons shall be punishable by a fine or imprisonment, or both, which may not exceed the maximum punishment prescribed for the offense, the commission of which was the object of the conspiracy.

It is unlawful for any person to manufacture or distribute a “simulated controlled substance,” or to possess with intent to distribute, a “simulated controlled substance.” Any person who violates this subsection shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and not more than one (1) year in the county jail, or both.
(g)(1) It is unlawful for any person to manufacture or distribute a “simulated controlled substance,” or to possess with intent to distribute, a “simulated controlled substance.” Any person who violates this subsection shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and not more than one (1) year in the county jail, or both.

It is unlawful for any person to possess a “simulated controlled substance.” Any person who violates this subsection shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine of not more than three hundred dollars ($300) and not more than six (6) months in the county jail, or both.

It is unlawful for any person to cause to be placed in any newspaper, magazine, handbill, or other publication, or to post or distribute in any public place, any advertisement or solicitation offering for sale simulated controlled substances. Any person who violates this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished in the same manner as prescribed in subsection (g) [(g)(1)] of this section.

No civil or criminal liability shall be imposed by virtue of this chapter on any person registered under the Uniform Controlled Substances Act who manufactures, distributes, or possesses an imitation controlled substance for use as a placebo or other use by a registered practitioner, as defined in section 37-2701(aa), Idaho Code, in the course of professional practice or research.

No prosecution under this chapter shall be dismissed solely by reason of the fact that the dosage units were contained in a bottle or other container with a label accurately describing the ingredients of the imitation controlled substance dosage units. The good faith of the defendant shall be an issue of fact for the trier of fact.

Upon conviction of a felony or misdemeanor violation under this chapter or upon conviction of a felony pursuant to the “racketeering act,” section 18-7804, Idaho Code, or the money laundering and illegal investment provisions of section 18-8201, Idaho Code, the court may order restitution for costs incurred by law enforcement agencies in investigating the violation. Law enforcement agencies shall include, but not be limited to, the Idaho state police, county and city law enforcement agencies, the office of the attorney general and county and city prosecuting attorney offices. Costs shall include, but not be limited to, those incurred for the purchase of evidence, travel and per diem for law enforcement officers and witnesses throughout the course of the investigation, hearings and trials, and any other investigative or prosecution expenses actually incurred, including regular salaries of employees. In the case of reimbursement to the Idaho state police, those moneys shall be paid to the Idaho state police for deposit into the drug and driving while under the influence enforcement donation fund created in section 57-816, Idaho Code. In the case of reimbursement to the office of the attorney general, those moneys shall be paid to the general fund. A conviction for the purposes of this section means that the person has pled guilty or has been found guilty, notwithstanding the form of the judgment(s) or withheld judgment(s).

(2) Any person who violates this subsection and has in his possession lysergic acid diethylamide is guilty of a felony and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than three (3) years, or fined not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.

§ 37-2732A. Sacramental use of peyote permitted.

The criminal sanctions provided in this chapter do not apply to that plant of the genus Lophophora Williamii [Williamsii] commonly known as peyote when such controlled substance is transported, delivered or possessed to be used as the sacrament in religious rites of a bona fide native American religious ceremony conducted by a bona fide religious organization; provided, that this exemption shall apply only to persons of native American descent who are members or eligible for membership in a federally recognized Indian tribe. Use of peyote as a sacrament in religious rites shall be restricted to Indian reservations as defined in subsection (2) of section 63-3622Z, Idaho Code. A person transporting, possessing or distributing peyote in this state for religious rites shall have on their person a tribal enrollment card, a card identifying the person as a native American church member and a permit issued by a bona fide religious organization authorizing the transportation, possession and distribution of peyote for religious rites.

§ 37-2732B. Trafficking — Mandatory sentences.

Except as authorized in this chapter, and notwithstanding the provisions of section 37-2732, Idaho Code:

Any person who knowingly manufactures, delivers, or brings into this state, or who is knowingly in actual or constructive possession of, one (1) pound of marijuana or more, or twenty-five (25) marijuana plants or more, as defined in section 37-2701, Idaho Code, is guilty of a felony, which felony shall be known as “trafficking in marijuana.” If the quantity of marijuana involved:

Is one (1) pound or more, but less than five (5) pounds, or consists of twenty-five (25) marijuana plants or more but fewer than fifty (50) marijuana plants, regardless of the size or weight of the plants, such person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum fixed term of imprisonment of one (1) year and fined not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000);

Is five (5) pounds or more, but less than twenty-five (25) pounds, or consists of fifty (50) marijuana plants or more but fewer than one hundred (100) marijuana plants, regardless of the size or weight of the plants, such person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum fixed term of imprisonment of three (3) years and fined not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000);

Is twenty-five (25) pounds or more, or consists of one hundred (100) marijuana plants or more, regardless of the size or weight of the plants, such person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum fixed term of imprisonment of five (5) years and fined not less than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000).

The maximum number of years of imprisonment for trafficking in marijuana shall be fifteen (15) years, and the maximum fine shall be fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

For the purposes of this section, the weight of the marijuana is its weight when seized or as determined as soon as practicable after seizure, unless the provisions of subsection (c) of this section apply.

Any person who knowingly manufactures, delivers, or brings into this state, or who is knowingly in actual or constructive possession of, twenty-eight (28) grams or more of cocaine or of any mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of cocaine is guilty of a felony, which felony shall be known as “trafficking in cocaine.” If the quantity involved:

Is twenty-eight (28) grams or more, but less than two hundred (200) grams, such person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum fixed term of imprisonment of three (3) years and fined not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000);

Is two hundred (200) grams or more, but less than four hundred (400) grams, such person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum fixed term of imprisonment of five (5) years and fined not less than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000);

Is four hundred (400) grams or more, such person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum fixed term of imprisonment of ten (10) years and fined not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

The maximum number of years of imprisonment for trafficking in cocaine shall be life, and the maximum fine shall be one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

Any person who knowingly manufactures or attempts to manufacture methamphetamine and/or amphetamine is guilty of a felony which shall be known as “trafficking in methamphetamine and/or amphetamine by manufacturing.” Any person convicted of trafficking in methamphetamine and/or amphetamine by attempted manufacturing shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum fixed term of imprisonment of two (2) years and not to exceed fifteen (15) years imprisonment and fined not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000). Any person convicted of trafficking in methamphetamine and/or amphetamine by manufacturing shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum fixed term of imprisonment of five (5) years and not to exceed life imprisonment and fined not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000). The maximum number of years of imprisonment for trafficking in methamphetamine and/or amphetamine by manufacturing shall be life, and the maximum fine shall be one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).
(4) Any person who knowingly delivers, or brings into this state, or who is knowingly in actual or constructive possession of, twenty-eight (28) grams or more of methamphetamine or amphetamine or of any mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of methamphetamine or amphetamine is guilty of a felony, which felony shall be known as “trafficking in methamphetamine or amphetamine.” If the quantity involved:

Any person who knowingly delivers, or brings into this state, or who is knowingly in actual or constructive possession of, twenty-eight (28) grams or more of methamphetamine or amphetamine or of any mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of methamphetamine or amphetamine is guilty of a felony, which felony shall be known as “trafficking in methamphetamine or amphetamine.” If the quantity involved:

Is twenty-eight (28) grams or more, but less than two hundred (200) grams, such person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum fixed term of imprisonment of three (3) years and fined not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000);

Is two hundred (200) grams or more, but less than four hundred (400) grams, such person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum fixed term of imprisonment of five (5) years and fined not less than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000);

Is four hundred (400) grams or more, such person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum fixed term of imprisonment of ten (10) years and fined not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

The maximum number of years of imprisonment for trafficking in methamphetamine or amphetamine shall be life, and the maximum fine shall be one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

Any person who knowingly manufactures, delivers, brings into this state, or who is knowingly in actual or constructive possession of the below-specified quantities of any of the following immediate precursors to methamphetamine or amphetamine (namely ephedrine, methylamine, methyl formamide, phenylacetic acid, phenylacetone, or pseudoephedrine) as defined in section 37-2707(g)(1), Idaho Code, or any compound, mixture or preparation which contains a detectable quantity of these substances, is guilty of a felony which shall be known as “trafficking in immediate precursors of methamphetamine or amphetamine.” If the quantity:

Of ephedrine is five hundred (500) grams or more;

Of methylamine is one-half (½) pint or more;

Of methyl formamide is one-quarter (¼) pint or more;

Of phenylacetic acid is five hundred (500) grams or more;

Of phenylacetone is four hundred (400) grams or more;

Of pseudoephedrine is five hundred (500) grams or more;

Any person who agrees, conspires, combines or confederates with another person or solicits another person to commit any act prohibited in subsection (a) of this section is guilty of a felony and is punishable as if he had actually committed such prohibited act.

For the purposes of subsections (a) and (b) of this section the weight of the controlled substance as represented by the person selling or delivering it is determinative if the weight as represented is greater than the actual weight of the controlled substance.

such person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum fixed term of imprisonment of ten (10) years and fined not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000). The maximum number of years of imprisonment for trafficking in immediate precursors of methamphetamine or amphetamine in the quantities specified in paragraphs (A) through (F) of this subsection (5) shall be life, and the maximum fine shall be one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000). If the quantity of pseudoephedrine is twenty-five (25) grams or more, but less than five hundred (500) grams, such person shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of up to ten (10) years and fined not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).
(6) Any person who knowingly manufactures, delivers or brings into this state, or who is knowingly in actual or constructive possession of, two (2) grams or more of heroin or any salt, isomer, or salt of an isomer thereof, or two (2) grams or more of any mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of any such substance is guilty of a felony, which felony shall be known as “trafficking in heroin.” If the quantity involved:

(A) Is two (2) grams or more, but less than seven (7) grams, such person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum fixed term of imprisonment of three (3) years and fined not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000);

(B) Is seven (7) grams or more, but less than twenty-eight (28) grams, such person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum fixed term of imprisonment of ten (10) years and fined not less than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000);

(C) Is twenty-eight (28) grams or more, such person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum fixed term of imprisonment of fifteen (15) years and fined not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(D) The maximum number of years of imprisonment for trafficking in heroin shall be life, and the maximum fine shall be one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

(7) A second conviction for any trafficking offense as defined in subsection (a) of this section shall result in a mandatory minimum fixed term that is twice that otherwise required under this section.

(8) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, with respect to any person who is found to have violated the provisions of this section, adjudication of guilt or the imposition or execution of sentence shall not be suspended, deferred, or withheld, nor shall such person be eligible for parole prior to serving the mandatory minimum fixed term of imprisonment prescribed in this section. Further, the court shall not retain jurisdiction.

§ 37-2732C. Using or being under the influence — Penalties.

Except as authorized in this chapter, it is unlawful for any person on a public roadway, on a public conveyance, on public property or on private property open to the public, to use or be under the influence of any controlled substance specified in subsection (b), (c), (d), (e) and (f) of section 37-2705, Idaho Code, or subsection (b), (c) and (d) of section 37-2707, Idaho Code, or subsection (c)(6) of section 37-2709, Idaho Code, or any narcotic drug classified in schedule III, IV or V, except when administered by or under the direction of a person licensed by the state to dispense, prescribe, or administer controlled substances. It shall be the burden of the defense to show that it comes within this exception.

Any person convicted of violating the provisions of subsection (a) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than six (6) months, or by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by both.

Any person who is convicted of violating subsection (a) of this section, when the offense occurred within five (5) years of that person being convicted of two (2) or more separate violations of that subsection and who refuses to complete a licensed drug rehabilitation program offered by the court pursuant to subsection (d) shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for a mandatory minimum period of time of not less than one hundred twenty (120) days, nor more than one (1) year. The court may not reduce the mandatory minimum period of incarceration provided in this subsection.

The court may, when it would be in the interest of justice, permit any person convicted of a violation of subsection (a) of this section, punishable under subsection (b) or (c) of this section, to complete a licensed drug rehabilitation program in lieu of part or all of the imprisonment in the county jail. As a condition of sentencing, the court may require the offender to pay all or a portion of the drug rehabilitation program. In order to alleviate jail overcrowding and to provide recidivist offenders with a reasonable opportunity to seek rehabilitation pursuant to this subsection, counties are encouraged to include provisions to augment licensed drug rehabilitation programs in their substance abuse proposals and applications submitted to the state for federal and state drug abuse funds.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), (b) or (c) of this section, or any other provision of law to the contrary, any person who is unlawfully under the influence of cocaine, cocaine base, methamphetamine, heroin, or phencyclidine while in the immediate personal possession of a loaded, operable firearm is guilty of a public offense and is punishable by imprisonment in the county jail or the state prison for not more than one (1) year. As used in this subsection, “immediate possession” includes, but is not limited to, the interior passenger compartment of a motor vehicle.

Every person who violates subsection (e) of this section is punishable upon the second and each subsequent conviction by imprisonment in the state prison for a period of time not in excess of four (4) years.

§ 37-2733. Prohibited acts B — Penalties.

It is unlawful for any person:

Who is subject to article III of this act to distribute or dispense a controlled substance in violation of section 37-2722, Idaho Code;

Who is a registrant, to manufacture a controlled substance not authorized by his registration, or to distribute or dispense a controlled substance not authorized by his registration to another registrant or other authorized person;

To refuse or fail to make, keep or furnish any record, notification, order form, statement, invoice or information required under this act;

To refuse an entry into any premises for any inspection authorized by this act; or

Knowingly to keep or maintain any store, shop, warehouse, dwelling, building, vehicle, boat, aircraft, or other structure or place, which is resorted to by persons using controlled substances in violation of this act for the purpose of using these substances, or which is used for keeping or selling them in violation of this act.

Any person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than one (1) year, fined not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), or both.

§ 37-2734. Prohibited acts C — Penalties.

It is unlawful for any person knowingly or intentionally:

To distribute as a registrant a controlled substance classified in schedule I or II, except pursuant to the requirements of section 37-2722, Idaho Code;

To use in the course of the manufacture or distribution of a controlled substance a registration number which is fictitious, revoked, suspended, or issued to another person;

To acquire or obtain possession of a controlled substance by misrepresentation, fraud, forgery, deception or subterfuge;

To furnish false or fraudulent material information in, or omit any material information from, any application, report, or other document required to be kept or filed under this act, or any record required to be kept by this act; or

To make, distribute, or possess any punch, die, plate, stone, or other thing designed to print, imprint, or reproduce the trademark, trade name, or other identifying mark, imprint, or device of another or any likeness of any of the foregoing upon any drug or container or labeling thereof so as to render the drug a counterfeit substance.

Any person who violates this section is guilty of a felony and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than four (4) years, or fined not more than thirty thousand dollars ($30,000), or both.

§ 37-2734A. Prohibited acts D — Penalties.

It is unlawful for any person to use, or to possess with intent to use, drug paraphernalia to plant, propagate, cultivate, grow, harvest, manufacture, compound, convert, produce, process, prepare, test, analyze, pack, repack, store, contain, conceal, inject, ingest, inhale, or otherwise introduce into the human body a controlled substance.

It is unlawful for any person to place in any newspaper, magazine, handbill, or other publication any advertisement, knowing, or under circumstances where one reasonably should know, that the purpose of the advertisement, in whole or in part, is to promote the sale of objects designed or intended for use as drug paraphernalia.

Any person who is in violation of the provisions of subsections (1) and/or (2) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than one (1) year, fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.

§ 37-2734B. Prohibited acts E — Penalties.

It is unlawful for any person to deliver, possess with intent to deliver, or manufacture with intent to deliver, drug paraphernalia, knowing, or under circumstances where one reasonably should know, that it will be used to plant, propagate, cultivate, grow, harvest, manufacture, compound, convert, produce, process, prepare, test, analyze, pack, repack, store, contain, conceal, inject, ingest, inhale, or otherwise introduce into the human body a controlled substance. Any person who is in violation of this section is guilty of a felony and upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than nine (9) years, fined not more than thirty thousand dollars ($30,000), or both.

§ 37-2734C. Prohibited acts F — Penalties.

A person is guilty of the crime of unlawful storage of anhydrous ammonia in a container that:

Is not approved by the United States department of transportation to hold anhydrous ammonia; or

Was not constructed to meet state and federal industrial health and safety standards for holding anhydrous ammonia.

Violation of this section is a felony.

This section does not apply to public employees or private contractors authorized to clean up and dispose of hazardous waste or toxic substances pursuant to the provisions of chapter 22, title 49, Idaho Code.

Any damages arising out of the unlawful possession of, storage of, or tampering with anhydrous ammonia equipment shall be the sole responsibility of the person or persons unlawfully possessing, storing or tampering with the anhydrous ammonia. In no case shall liability for damages arising out of the unlawful possession of, storage of, or tampering with anhydrous ammonia or anhydrous ammonia equipment extend to the lawful owner, installer, maintainer, designer, manufacturer, possessor or seller of the anhydrous ammonia or anhydrous ammonia equipment, unless such damages arise out of the acts or omissions of the owner, installer, maintainer, designer, manufacturer, possessor or seller that constitute negligent misconduct to abide by the laws regarding anhydrous ammonia possession and storage.

§ 37-2735. Penalties under other laws.

Any penalty imposed for violation of this act is in addition to, and not in lieu of, any civil or administrative penalty or sanction otherwise authorized by law.

§ 37-2735A. Drug hotline fee.

In addition to any other penalties, a person convicted of a violation of this chapter shall be subject to an additional fine of ten dollars ($10.00) to be deposited in the drug and driving while under the influence enforcement donation fund, as set forth in section 57-816, Idaho Code, to be used for the purposes designated in that section.

§ 37-2736. Bar to prosecution.

If a violation of this act is a violation of a federal law or the law of another state, a conviction or acquittal under federal law or the law of another state for the same act is a bar to prosecution in this state.

§ 37-2737. Distribution to persons under age 18.

Any person eighteen (18) years of age or over who violates section 37-2732(a), Idaho Code, by distributing any nonnarcotic drug classified in schedule I, or any controlled substance classified in schedule III, IV, V, or VI, to a person under eighteen (18) years of age who is at least three (3) years his junior is punishable by the fine authorized by section 37-2732(a)(1)(B), (C) or (D), Idaho Code, by a term of imprisonment of up to twice that authorized by section 37-2732(a)(1)(B), (C) or (D), Idaho Code, or by both.

§ 37-2737A. Manufacture or delivery of controlled substance where children are present.

Except as authorized in this chapter, it is unlawful for any person to manufacture or deliver, or possess with the intent to manufacture or deliver, a controlled substance as defined in schedules I, II, III and IV in this chapter, upon the same premises where a child under the age of eighteen (18) years is present.

As used in this section, “premises” means any:

Motor vehicle or vessel;

Dwelling or rental unit including, but not limited to, apartment, townhouse, condominium, mobile home, manufactured home, motel room or hotel room;

Dwelling house, its curtilage and any other outbuildings.

Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, a person who violates the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a felony and upon conviction may be imprisoned for a term not to exceed five (5) years, fined not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or be both so imprisoned and fined.

A person who violates the provisions of this section by manufacturing or delivering, or possessing with the intent to manufacture or deliver, methamphetamine or amphetamine in quantities as specified in section 37-2732B(a)(4), Idaho Code, shall be guilty of a felony and upon conviction may be imprisoned for a term of up to ten (10) years, fined not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), or be both so imprisoned and fined.

Any fine imposed under the provisions of this section shall be in addition to the fine imposed for any other offense, and any term of imprisonment shall be consecutive to any term imposed for any other offense, regardless of whether the violation of the provisions of this section and any of the other offenses have arisen from the same act or transaction.